csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Imp_Cw.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: mizhok
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: mizhoshin
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: mizh
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [mizhoshinaan,mizhoshinaang]
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: miizhwaadaanig
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: miizhwaadaa
